Rhode Island, session 2025, SB621.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 40.1-5-41 of the General Laws in Chapter 40.1-5 entitled "Mental
Health Law" is hereby amended to read as follows:
40.1-5-41. Immunity of physicians and surgeons from liability Immunity from
liability.
Nothing contained herein shall be deemed to contravene the provisions of § 5-37-14, and
no physician or surgeon advanced practice registered nurse (APRN) licensed to practice in this
state, or having a privilege to practice in this state, and having met the requirements either of the
statute or of this chapter, shall be made to answer in any court for his or her participation in any
proceeding under this chapter except upon a showing of actual fraud; provided further, that no
physician or surgeon shall be made to answer in any court for any damage or injury to any person
or thing arising out of a patient’s enjoyment and/or exercise of rights protected by this chapter
including, without limitation, discharge, where the enjoyment and/or exercise of the rights, or any
of them, are in contravention of either the written orders or prescription or advice of a physician or
surgeon or gross, willful or wanton negligence.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001363
========